test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_NoExtra_biitoosijigan_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gibiitoosijiganenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gibiitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gibiitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganensimishiniibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganensimishiniibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganensimishiniibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: obiitoosijiganenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: obiitoosijiganenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: obiitoosijiganenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: obiitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: obiitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: obiitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
